Maryland, session 2025, HB0224.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
11–705.
(a) Any person who violates any provision of this subtitle is subject to a penalty
not exceeding [$500] $1,000 for each violation, which penalty the Attorney General may
recover for the State in a civil action.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0224*